Illinois, session 104th, HB2163.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 128/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8School Safety Drill Act. 9(Source: P.A. 94-600, eff. 8-16-05.)